Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska18-627
Private property; condemnation; resolution; requirements; procedure.

When it becomes necessary to appropriate or damage any private property for the construction of a viaduct or subway as provided in sections 18-617 to 18-636, such appropriation shall be made by resolution. The resolution shall be published once each week for three weeks in a legal newspaper published in or of general circulation in such city or village. The publication shall be sufficient notice to the owners, occupants, and parties interested, and all parties having equitable interest therein. The procedure to condemn property shall be exercised in the manner set forth in sections 76-704 to 76-724.

Laws 1949, c. 28, § 9, p. 107;

Laws 1951, c. 101, § 63, p. 476;

Laws 2021, LB163, § 62.